South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S623.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Limit of moderate wave action line SECTION 1. Georgetown County is exempt from building requirements for properties within, or affected by, the limit of moderate wave action line as shown on the May 9, 2023, flood insurance rate map and may enforce AE standards as set forth in Georgetown County's Flood Damage Prevention ordinance and the current state building code. Repeal upon adoption of next limit of moderate wave action line SECTION 2. The provisions of this act are repealed upon the adoption of the next limit of moderate wave action line. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 20th day of May, 2025. Vetoed by the Governor -- 5/22/25. Veto overridden by Senate -- 2/4/26. Veto overridden by House -- 2/10/26. -- L. ----XX----